Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="pil/A__n">
<e><p><l>Ati</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AtA</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ate</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:te"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Atie</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tie"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AtAe</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmAne</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmAnafku</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aku</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmAnafka</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fka"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmAnafkara</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Atiku</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Atira</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ara</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Agudika</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Agudikara</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Agudifku</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Agudiku</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Afka</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fka"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Afku</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Afkara</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AgudA</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AgudAfku</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:fku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aru</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ru"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AtAku</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ae</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>
<pardef n="prakqwa/__n">
<e><p><l>re</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:re"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/muz__p">
<e><p><l>muz</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mowe</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mora</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ra"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mo</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ra"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>moxbArA</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>moTAru</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:TAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>moTAre</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:TAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ame</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmemAne</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ama</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ra"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Amaku</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmaxbArA</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmaTAru</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:TAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmaTAre</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:TAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Amara</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ra"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmamAnafku</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmamAnafka</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmamAnafkara</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmamAnafkaTAre</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmamAnafkaTAru</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmamAnafka_xbArA</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AmamAnafka_pAiz</l><r>muz<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_pAiz"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<e lm="pilA"><i>pil</i><par n="pil/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="prakqwa"><i>prakqwa</i><par n="prakqwa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="muz"><i></i><par n="/muz__p"/></e>
